California, session 20252026, AB17.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12263 is added to the Elections Code, to read:12263. The registrar of voters in each county shall make available, upon request by any member of the public, a map in digital form provided free of charge that shows the effective boundaries of each precinct within the county.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.